Iowa, session 2025-2026, 1397XD.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 1397XD (5) 91
jda/jh

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Section 1. Section 256.210, subsection 6, paragraph a, Code
2025, is amended to read as follows:
a. Notwithstanding section 8.33, funds appropriated
for purposes of this section which remain unencumbered or
unobligated at the close of the fiscal year for which the funds
were appropriated shall not revert but shall be available for
expenditure for the following fiscal year upon the authority
of the adjutant general for purposes of this section, section
256.210A, and section 256.211.
Sec. 2. NEW SECTION. 256.210A National guard service
professional qualification scholarship program.
1. A national guard service professional qualification
scholarship program is established to be administered by the
college student aid commission for members of the Iowa national
guard who are participating in an educational program leading
to a credential that is approved by the adjutant general and
offered by a community college, an institution of higher
learning under the state board of regents, or an accredited
private institution. The college student aid commission shall
adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A to administer this section.
2. An individual is eligible for the national guard
service professional qualification scholarship program if the
individual meets all of the following conditions:
a. Is a resident of the state and a member of an Iowa army
or air national guard unit while receiving scholarship award
payments issued pursuant to this section.
b. Satisfactorily completed required initial active duty
training.
c. Maintains satisfactory performance of duty upon return
from initial active duty training.
d. Is enrolled in an educational program that has been
approved by the adjutant general and is offered by a community
college as defined in section 260C.2, an institution of higher
learning under the control of the board of regents, or an
accredited private institution as defined in section 256.183.
LSB 1397XD (5) 91
-1- jda/jh 1/4

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
e. Is maintaining satisfactory academic progress toward a
credential.
f. Provides proper notice of national guard status to the
community college or institution at the time of registration
for the term in which program benefits are sought.
g. Completes and submits application forms required by the
commission and applies for all nonrepayable state and federal
financial aid for which the member is eligible.
h. Submits an application to the adjutant general of
Iowa, on forms prescribed by the adjutant general, who shall
determine eligibility and whose determination is final.
Notwithstanding any deadline established for the administration
of this paragraph, the adjutant general shall accept an
application submitted pursuant to this paragraph from an
otherwise eligible member of the national guard who was on
federal active duty at the time of such deadline.
3. Scholarship awards paid pursuant to this section shall
not exceed the total cost charged by the institution attended
by the national guard member for the educational program
leading to a credential. If the amount available for, or
appropriated in, a fiscal year for purposes of this section
is insufficient to provide scholarships to all national guard
members who apply for the program and who are verified by the
adjutant general to be eligible for the program, the adjutant
general shall, in coordination with the college student aid
commission, determine the distribution of scholarships.
4. The eligibility of applicants and scholarship award
amounts to be paid shall be certified by the adjutant general
to the college student aid commission, and all amounts that
are or become due to a community college, accredited private
institution, or institution of higher learning under the
control of the state board of regents under this section shall
be paid to the college or institution by the college student
aid commission upon receipt of certification by the president
or governing board of the educational institution as to
LSB 1397XD (5) 91
-2- jda/jh 2/4

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
accuracy of charges made, and as to the attendance and academic
progress of the individual at the educational institution.
The college student aid commission shall maintain an annual
record of the number of participants and the dollar value of
the awards issued.
5. The adjutant general shall publish and maintain a list of
approved educational programs that are eligible for purposes of
this section.
6. The adjutant general has the authority under this section
to authorize the expenditure of unencumbered or unobligated
funds as described in section 256.210, subsection 6, for
purposes of this section.
7. For purposes of this section, “credential” means a
postsecondary certificate or other competency-based credential
that is not authorized for federal student aid under Tit.
IV of the federal Higher Education Act of 1965, as amended.
“Credential” does not include an associate degree or any degree
beyond an associate degree.